Montana, session 2025, SB78.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 81-9-112, MCA, is amended to read:
"81-9-112. Inspection and marking of hides and meat of slaughtered cattle or horses -- records
-- bill of sale -- when inspection not necessary. (1) All slaughtering establishments required to be licensed
under 81-9-201 shall maintain the hide of an animal in its entirety with tail and ears attached for each animal
slaughtered until inspected by a state or deputy state stock inspector in the county where the animal was
slaughtered. The inspector shall mark the hide in the manner prescribed by the department. This inspection
may be waived for animals inspected by a state or deputy state stock inspector on a preslaughter inspection.
(2) Each dressed carcass of a slaughtered animal must be stamped with an ink stamp in a manner
specified by the department. The inspector shall keep a record and issue a certificate of inspection as specified
by the department, giving the name and address of the establishment or person, the serial number of the
inspection of the hide, the brand on the hide, if applicable, the date of inspection, and the place where the
inspection was made. The inspector shall forward a copy of the inspection certificate to the department and
issue one copy to the person requesting the inspection.
(3) When ownership of the carcass and hide presented is claimed on a bill of sale, the officer
making the inspection shall demand and must receive the original bill of sale and shall attach it to the
inspector's certificate sent to the county clerk and recorder. When the bills of sale cover cattle or horses not
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 78
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 78
included in the inspection, the inspector shall issue to the owner of the bill of sale a receipt for the bill of sale.
The receipt must describe the balance of the cattle or horses covered by the original bill of sale.
(4) A person who kills livestock in good faith for the person's own use is not required to have the
meat inspected or stamped."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 78
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 78, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 78
INTRODUCED BY J. KASSMIER
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LIVESTOCK
AN ACT GENERALLY REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE INSPECTION AND MARKING OF HIDES AND
MEAT OF SLAUGHTERED ANIMALS; ELIMINATING THE REQUIREMENT THAT EACH DRESSED CARCASS
OF A SLAUGHTERED ANIMAL MUST BE STAMPED; REVISING BILL OF SALE REQUIREMENTS;
AMENDING SECTION 81-9-112, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”